Washington statutes.
RCW 39.64.020

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter a "taxing district" is defined to be a "taxing district" as described in section 80 of chapter IX of the act of congress entitled "An act to establish a uniform system of bankruptcy throughout the United States," approved July 1, 1898, as amended, to wit:

"Any municipality or other political subdivision of any state, including (but not hereby limiting the generality of the foregoing) any county, city, borough, village, parish, town, or township, unincorporated tax or special assessment district, and any school, drainage, irrigation, reclamation, levee, sewer, or paving, sanitary, port, improvement or other district (hereinafter referred to as a 'taxing district')."

Said act of congress and acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto, as the same may be amended from time to time, are herein referred to as the "federal bankruptcy act."

[ 1935 c 143 s 3; RRS s 5608-3.]